Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1815
Seed potatoes; when exempt from act.

The provisions of sections 2-1813 to 2-1825 shall not include seed potatoes officially designated by law as Nebraska Certified.

Laws 1969, c. 20, § 7, p. 188.